Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 16 Kosher Foods

21-16-1.
Violations or deception as to religious dietary laws by dealers in meats.

A person, firm, or corporation shall be guilty of a misdemeanor:

Who shall knowingly sell or expose for sale any meat or meat preparation, either raw or prepared for human consumption, and falsely represent it to be kosher or as having been prepared under the supervision of a rabbi or as a product or products sanctioned by the traditional or orthodox Hebrew religious requirements and dietary laws;

Who shall falsely represent any food product or the contents of any package or container to be constituted and prepared, by having or permitting to be inscribed on it the word “kosher” in any language;

Who shall sell or expose for sale in the same place of business both kosher and non-kosher meat or meat preparation, either raw or prepared for human consumption, who fails to indicate on the window signs and all display advertising, in block letters at least four inches (4") in height, “kosher and non-kosher meat sold here”;

Who shall expose for sale in any show window or place of business both kosher and non-kosher meat or meat preparation, either raw or prepared for human consumption, who fails to display over each kind of meat or meat preparation so exposed a sign in block letters at least four inches (4") in height reading “kosher meat” or “non-kosher meat,” as the case may be;

Who shall, while dealing or purporting to deal in kosher meat or meat preparations, prepare or handle or sell, or cause to be prepared or handled or sold, any food product which, when prepared or handled or sold together with kosher meat or meat preparation, constitutes a violation of the traditional or orthodox Hebrew religious requirements and dietary laws, and by which renders the kosher meat or meat preparation non-kosher;

Who shall in the preparation, handling, or sale of kosher meat or meat preparation fail to comply strictly with the religious requirements and dietary laws necessary to constitute the meat or meat preparation genuinely kosher;

Who shall, without complying with Hebrew religious or dietary laws, issue or maintain any sign or advertisement in any language purporting to represent that he or she sells or deals in kosher meat or meat preparations; or

Who shall display on his or her window, door, or in his or her place of business, words or letters in the Hebrew language, or any sign, emblem, insignia, symbol, or mark in simulation of Hebrew words or letters, the display of which might reasonably be calculated to deceive or lead a person to believe that a representation, express or implied, is being made that the meat or meat preparation exposed for sale is kosher and in conformity with the traditional or orthodox Hebrew religious requirements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, 2497, 2496, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 613, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-16-1

; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 38; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 48.

21-16-2.
Violations and deception by restaurants.

A person, firm, or corporation who shall knowingly sell or expose for sale in any restaurant or other place where food products are sold for consumption on the premises any article of food or food preparation falsely represented as kosher or as having been prepared in accordance with the orthodox or traditional Hebrew religious requirements, either by direct statements, orally or in writing, or by display of the word “kosher” in English or Hebrew letters, or by the display of any sign or mark in simulation of that word, or by the display of any insignia, six-pointed star, or any mark which might reasonably be calculated to deceive or lead a reasonable person to believe that a representation is being made that the food sold is kosher or prepared in accordance with the traditional or orthodox Hebrew religious requirements, or who shall sell or expose for sale in a restaurant or other place both kosher and non-kosher food or food preparation, or who shall prepare, handle, combine, or serve kosher foods in a manner not sanctioned by the traditional or orthodox Hebrew religious requirements, who fails to display on his window signs and all display advertising in block letters at least four inches (4") in height ”kosher and non-kosher food served here” shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2497, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 613, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-16-2

.

21-16-3.
False labeling as to fitness for Passover.

A person, firm, or corporation who shall stamp or label or cause to be stamped or labeled any can, jar, package, or other container of food or food preparation, falsely representing these to be kosher for Passover use or as having been prepared for Passover use under the supervision or sanction of any accredited rabbi of the traditional or orthodox Hebrew religion, by having or permitting to be inscribed on them the words “kosher for Passover” in any language or any sign or mark in simulation of those words in any language or any mark which might reasonably be calculated to deceive or lead a reasonable person to believe that the contents are represented as kosher for Passover use or as prepared under the supervision or sanction of an accredited rabbi of the traditional or orthodox Hebrew religion, and a person, firm, or corporation who shall knowingly sell or expose for sale any falsely stamped or labeled can, jar, package, or other container shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2497, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 613, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-16-3

.

21-16-4.
Penalties — Prosecution of violations.

A person, firm, or corporation convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall, for the first offense, be punished by a fine in the sum of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) and not more than three hundred dollars ($300) and for the second and each subsequent offense by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by other fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. It shall be the duty of every board of health and the health department of any city or town and the department of health of the state whenever cognizant of any violation of this chapter to prosecute any person, firm, or corporation which it has reason to believe has violated any of the provisions of this chapter, and after deducting the costs of trial and conviction, to retain for the use of the board or department the balance of the fine or fines recovered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2497, § 4; P.L. 1938, ch. 2612, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 613, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-16-4

.